Washington statutes.
RCW 43.17.030

Powers and duties—Oath.

The directors of the several departments shall exercise such powers and perform such executive and administrative duties as are provided by law.

Each appointive officer before entering upon the duties of his or her office shall take and subscribe the oath of office prescribed by law for elective state officers, and file the same in the office of the secretary of state.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5058; 1965 c 8 s 43.17.030. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 18; RRS s 10776.]

NOTES:

Oaths of elective state officers: RCW 43.01.020.